test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-AN-otanisimaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - tânis - ok : # -m dep. animate noun, daughter, poss.paradigm Okimasis p 140

     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitânis
     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitânis
     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otânisa
     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: otânisiyiwa
     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitânisinân
     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitânisinaw
     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitânisiwâw
     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otânisiwâwa 
     -tânis+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: otânisiyiwa

     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitânisak
     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitânisak
     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otânisa
     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: otânisiyiwa
     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitânisinânak
     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitânisinawak
     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitânisiwâwak
     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otânisiwâwa
     -tânis+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: otânisiyiwa

     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicânisisis
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicânisisis
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocânisisisa
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicânisisisinân
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicânisisisinaw
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicânisisisiwâw
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiwâwa
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa

     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicânisisisak
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicânisisisak
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocânisisisa
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicânisisisinânak
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicânisisisinawak
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicânisisisiwâwak
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiwâwa
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: ocânisisisiyiwa

     -tânis+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitânisihk
     -tânis+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitânisihk
     -tânis+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otânisihk
     -tânis+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: otânisiyihk
     -tânis+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitânisinâhk
     -tânis+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitânisinâhk
     -tânis+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitânisiwâhk
     -tânis+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otânisiwâhk
     -tânis+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: otânisiyihk

     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicânisisisihk
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicânisisisihk
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocânisisisihk
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Sg+Loc: ocânisisisiyihk
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicânisisisinâhk
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicânisisisinâhk
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicânisisisiwâhk
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocânisisisiwâhk
     -tânis+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px4Pl+Loc: ocânisisisiyihk
